src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON ORGÁDNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ádna with long and short compound-form

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:an%> R                          ;
                      :ádna MUORRAInfl                 ;
                      :ádna MUORRACmp                  ;
              +Area/SE:ánna MUORRAInfl                 ; !In swe both dn and nn in use
              +Area/SE:ánna MUORRACmp                  ; !In swe both dn and nn in use
              
             +Err/Orth:an   A_CMP_INFL                 ; ! makes old organa


!!€gt-norm: doarjjaorgádna # Even-syllable test
!!€ doarjjaorgádna:                 doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ doarjjaorgánna:                 doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ doarjjaorgánav:                 doarjjaorgádna+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON KOLLÆKTA
 +OLang/NOB: KOLLÆKTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON KOLLÆKTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ækta with long and short compound-form

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:ekt%>     R                    ;
                      :ækta      MUORRAInfl           ;
                      :ækta      MUORRACmp            ;
                      
             +Err/Orth:ekt       A_CMP_INFL           ; ! makes old kollekta, kollektav

!!€gt-norm: subjækta # Even-syllable test
!!€ subjækta:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ subjäkta:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ subjevtas:                 subjækta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON HYDROGIEDNA
 +OLang/NOB: HYDROGIEDNA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON HYDROGIEDNA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -iedna in NOR and -edna in SWE. Both long and short compound-form. Norwegian/swedish -en. The old standardization form -ena, without cg, is subtaged. See comments about the -ie/-e dialtags in ALFABIEHTTA.

 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:en%>       R                    ; !Short cmp "hydrogenbummba"
              +Area/SE:edna       MUORRAInfl           ; ! In swe both edna and enna in use
              +Area/SE:edna       MUORRACmp            ; ! In swe both edna and enna in use
              +Area/SE:enna       MUORRAInfl           ; ! In swe both edna and enna in use
              +Area/SE:enna       MUORRACmp            ; ! In swe both edna and enna in use
              +Area/NO:iedna      MUORRAInfl           ;
              +Area/NO:iedna      MUORRACmp            ;
                               
LEXICON PATÆNNTA
 +OLang/NOB: PATÆNNTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON PATÆNNTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ænnta with long and short compound-form. The -ennta form (used in "Ådå testamennta") is taged as sub (e always becomes æ in grade three).
 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:ent%> R                          ;
                      :ænnta MUORRAInfl                 ;
                      :ænnta MUORRACmp                  ;

             +Err/Orth:ennta ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ; !not possible with e in 3.grade!
             +Err/Orth:æntta ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ; !not possible with e in 3.grade!


!!€gt-norm: patænnta # Even-syllable test
!!€ patænnta:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ patännta:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ patentas:                 patænnta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON VARIÁNNTA
 +OLang/NOB: VARIÁNNTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON VARIÁNNTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ánnta with long and short compound-form. Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.
 +CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:ant%> R          ;
                      :ánnta MUORRAInfl ;
                      :ánnta MUORRACmp  ;

             +Err/Orth:ánnda MUORRAInfl ; !makes variánnda
             +Err/Orth:ánnda MUORRACmp  ; !makes variánnda
             +Err/Orth:ant   A_CMP_INFL ; ! makes old varianta
             +Err/Orth:ántta ERR/ORTH_EVEN_STRONG_CASES ;



!!€gt-norm: praktikánnta # Even-syllable test
!!€ praktikánnta:                 praktikánnta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ praktikántas:                 praktikánnta+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON FANATISSMA
 +OLang/NOB: FANATISSMA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON FANATISSMA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ssma with long and short compound-form.
 
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/SE+Cmp/Unass:sm%>  R                          ;
 +CmpNP/Pref+Area/NO+Cmp/Unass:sme%> R                          ;
                              :ssma  MUORRAInfl                 ;
                              :ssma  MUORRACmp                  ;

!!€gt-norm: kabbalissma # Even-syllable test
!!€ kabbalissma:                 kabbalissma+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ kabbalismas:                 kabbalissma+N+Sg+Ela


LEXICON TURISSTA
 : TURISSTA_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON TURISSTA_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Recent loanwords on -ssta with long and short compound-form. -lasj derivation is error taged.  Frequently typos that does not follow lulesami rules are sub taged; These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

 +OLang/NOB+CmpNP/Pref+Cmp/Unass:st9%> R                          ;
                                :ssta  MUORRA_LOAN_NO_LASJ        ;

!!€gt-norm: journalissta # Even-syllable test
!!€ journalissta:                 journalissta+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ journalistas:                 journalissta+N+Sg+Ela



!! ### Loanwords becoming odd-syll
! - - - - - -

LEXICON PRIEMIJ
 +OLang/NOB: PRIEMIJ_CMP_INFL ;

LEXICON PRIEMIJ_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@ Assimilated loanwords. on -ie/-y, like premie and bandy. Become odd syllable loan words with cg, like "riebij". Nom: premij, gen prebmiha. Long and short essive.
    +Sg+Nom:j%>Q1 K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:n%>Q1 K-CONS                ; !Short
       +Ess:hin%> K-CONS                ; !Long
           :h%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :h»    DenominalNounsODD ;
           :h»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :h%>   ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:j%>Q1 R                 ;
           :h%>   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: priemij # Even-syllable test
!!€ priemij:                  priemij+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ premij:                  priemij+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ priebmihis:               priemij+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ prebmihis:               priemij+N+Sg+Ela
!!€ priemin:                  priemij+N+Ess
!!€ premin:                  priemij+N+Ess
!!€ priebmihin:               priemij+N+Ess
!!€ prebmihin:               priemij+N+Ess


!! ### Loanwords becoming contracted-syll

!! ### See further down: ÅLMÅJ_LOAN


!! ###  Error-lexicons, made to not get too many entries with both Err/Orth and correct
! - - - - - -

LEXICON A_CMP_INFL !!= @CODE@  Sub-forms. Lexicon for giving sub-variation conjugation by simply adding an -a to the norwegian/swedish word. No cg. Like "alkohola" and "agronoma". These forms goes against the standarization rule, but are found because of earlier standarizations rules and dictionaries.

           :a%>  N-EVENSTRONGSTEM     ;
           :a%>  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ;
           :a»   DenominalNounsMUORRA ;
           :a»   DenominalAdjsV1      ; !-dibme adj caritive derivation
           :a»   DenominalAdjsV2      ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:a%>  R                    ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:a%>  R                    ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:a%>j R                    ;


LEXICON ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES !!= @CODE@ Even stem Err/orth lexicon without nominative, illative and essive. Only for entries with ERR/ORTH tag. Made so that we don't get entries that are both norm and with error tag. Entries like "ålggo" have no grade alternation, a common error is writing it like it has, ålggo>ålgov. tálla>tálav, klimáksa>klimáksav, prefiksa>prefiksav, barggo>barggov

          :%>Q4  N-EVENWEAKSTEM       ; ! Q4=Stem vowel change e:i and o:u in front of j. Dipht. simpl. Like Q1 but strong grade.          
+Cmp/SgGen:      R ;
+Cmp/PlGen:Y6j   R ;
          :»     DenominalNounsNOADE  ;
          :»Z2   DenominalAdjsV2      ; !-lasj Z2=vowel changes without WeG 
          
