src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
aktanbarggo+N+Err/Cmp+Sem/Act:aktan#barggo ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ; !førsteledd er ikke mulig i sammensetninger
assistænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:assist PATÆNNTA ; !
bandij+N+Sem/Sport:banndi PRIEMIJ ;
baptissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bapti TURISSTA ;
behaviorissma+N+Sem/Ideol:behavi^ori FANATISSMA ; !
bensiedna+N+Sem/Dummytag:bens HYDROGIEDNA ;
birsso+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Wpn:birso ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ; !
blyánnta+N+Sem/Tool-write:bly VARIÁNNTA ;
demonstránnta+N+Sem/Hum:demonstr VARIÁNNTA ;
dialækta+N+Sem/Lang:dial KOLLÆKTA ; !
dirigænnta+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:dirisj PATÆNNTA ; !
doarroladdne+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:doarro#ladne ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ;
effækta+N+Sem/State:eff KOLLÆKTA ;
eksperimænnta+N+Area/SE+Sem/Act:experim PATÆNNTA ;
ekstremissma+N+Area/NO+Sem/Ideol:ekstremi FANATISSMA ; ! GG
ekstremissta+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:extremi TURISSTA ;
fierij+N+Area/NO+Sem/Time:fierri PRIEMIJ ;
fontiedna+N+Sem/Mat:font HYDROGIEDNA ;
formánnta+N+Sem/Prod-audio:form VARIÁNNTA ;
fáhkadepartemænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:fáhka#departem PATÆNNTA ; !
gigantissma+N+Sem/Dummytag:giganti FANATISSMA ;
gitarissta+N+Area/NO+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gitari TURISSTA ;
glykogiedna+N+Sem/Substnc:glykog HYDROGIEDNA ;
gummij+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Mat:gummi ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ;
gummij+N+Sem/Mat:gumºmi PRIEMIJ ;
guovddakonsonánnta+N+Sem/Cat:guovdda#konson VARIÁNNTA ;
halogiedna+N+Sem/Cat:halog HYDROGIEDNA ;
håhkij+N+Sem/Sport:håhkki PRIEMIJ ;
idiolækta+N+Sem/Cat:idiol KOLLÆKTA ;
insækta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ins KOLLÆKTA ; !
isomorfissma+N+Sem/Dummytag:isomorfi FANATISSMA ;
journalissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:journali TURISSTA ; !
karantiedna+N+Sem/State:karant HYDROGIEDNA ;
knækta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:kn KOLLÆKTA ;
kollækta+N+Sem/Act:koll KOLLÆKTA ; !
kommendánnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:kommend VARIÁNNTA ;
konnossemænnta+N+Sem/Txt:konnossem PATÆNNTA ;
kritierra+N+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Semcon:kritierri PRIEMIJ ; !kriterie er ikke det norske ordet, men kriterium, derfor err/orth
kubissma+N+Sem/Domain:kubi FANATISSMA ; !
leutnánnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:leutn VARIÁNNTA ;
lingvissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:lingvi TURISSTA ;
láhtto+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:láhto ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ;
metyliedna+N+Sem/Dummytag:metyl HYDROGIEDNA ;
monopolkapitalissma+N+Sem/Ideol:monopol#kapitali FANATISSMA ; !
nitrogiedna+N+Sem/Substnc:nitrog HYDROGIEDNA ;
norvagissma+N+Sem/Dummytag:norvagi FANATISSMA ;
oajvvefáhkastudænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oajvve#fáhka#stud PATÆNNTA ;
organissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:organi TURISSTA ;
partisipánnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:partisip VARIÁNNTA ;
populissma+N+Sem/Ideol:populi FANATISSMA ; !
pronåvmmåsubjækta+N+Sem/Cat+Err/Orth:pronuvman#subj KOLLÆKTA ;
realissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:re^ali TURISSTA ;
respækta+N+Sem/Feat:re^sp KOLLÆKTA ;
ruhtadusdepartemænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:ruhtadus#departem PATÆNNTA ; !
safárij+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Act:safárri PRIEMIJ ; ! LOAN
sekánnta+N+Sem/Dummytag:sek VARIÁNNTA ;
siriedna+N+Sem/Dummytag:si^r HYDROGIEDNA ; !
sosialissma+N+Area/NO+Sem/Ideol:sosi^ali FANATISSMA ; ! GG
sosiolækta+N+Area/SE+Sem/Cat:sociol KOLLÆKTA ;
spesialissta+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:speci^ali TURISSTA ;
stuorradikkepresidænnta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:stuorra#dikke#presid PATÆNNTA ; !
stárro+N+Sem/Plant+Err/Orth:stáro ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ;
tavsij+N+Sem/Veh:taksi PRIEMIJ ; !LOAN
tjilij+v2+N+Sem/Fruit:tjijlli PRIEMIJ ; !LOAN chili (chiiiili)
vokalissta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:vokali TURISSTA ;
vuossa+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Ctain:vuosa ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ;
ássje+N+Sem/Semcon+Err/Orth:ásje ERR/ORTH_EVEN_WEAK_CASES ; !
økonomikonsulænnta+N+Area/SE+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ekonomi#konsul PATÆNNTA ; ! "Økonomi" is "ekonomi" in Sweden.
østrogiedna+N+Sem/Dummytag:østro^g HYDROGIEDNA ;
protestánnta+N+Sem/Hum:protest VARIÁNNTA ; !GG
